Washington statutes.
RCW 35.41.070

Suit to compel city to pay amount into special fund.

If a city or town fails to set aside and pay into the special fund created for the payment of revenue bonds and warrants the amount which it has obligated itself in the ordinance creating the fund to set aside and pay therein, the holder of any bond or warrant issued against the bond may bring suit against the city or town to compel it to do so.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.41.070. Prior: 1957 c 117 s 7.]